District of Columbia statutes.
6-101.07

Definitions.

As used in this subchapter and subchapter II of this chapter:

(1)

The term “alley” means:

(A)

Any court, thoroughfare, or passage, private or public, less than 30 feet wide at any point; and

(B)

Any court, thoroughfare, or passage, private or public, 30 feet or more in width, that does not open directly with a width of at least 30 feet upon a public street that is at least 40 feet wide from building line to building line.

(2)

The term “inhabited alley” means an alley in or appurtenant to which there are 1 or more alley dwellings.

(3)

The term “alley dwelling” means any dwelling fronting upon or having its principal means of ingress from an alley. This definition does not include an accessory building, such as a garage, with living rooms for servants or other employees, if the principal entrance to the living rooms of the accessory building is from the street property to which it is accessory.

(4)

The term “dwelling” means any building or structure used or designed to be used in whole or in part as a living or a sleeping place by 1 or more human beings.

(5)

The term “person” includes any individual, partnership, corporation, or association.

June 12, 1934, 48 Stat. 933, ch. 465, § 7
This section is referenced in § 22-1321.
1981 Ed., § 5-108.
1973 Ed., § 5-109.